Colorado, session 2026A, HB1114.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 5 to article
35 of title 29 as follows:
PART 5
MINIMUM LOT SIZE
29-35-501. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) HOUSING AFFORDABILITY IS A MAJOR ISSUE THAT AFFECTS ALL
COLORADANS. HOUSING AFFORDABILITY AFFECTS WHERE PEOPLE ARE
ABLE TO LIVE, WHICH IN TURN AFFECTS TRANSIT, COMMUTING, THE
WORKFORCE, AND THE ENVIRONMENT, THEREBY AFFECTING THE
WELL-BEING OF PEOPLE ACROSS COLORADO;
(b) RISING LAND COSTS ARE A SIGNIFICANT DRIVER OF
UNAFFORDABLE HOUSING IN COLORADO, WITH LAND VALUES RISING FROM
THIRTY-ONE PERCENT OF COLORADO HOME VALUES IN 2012 TO
FIFTY-EIGHT PERCENT IN 2024, ACCORDING TO THE AMERICAN
ENTERPRISE INSTITUTE;
(c) LAND VALUE MODELING SHOWS THAT, IN THE MAJORITY OF
CORE-BASED STATISTICAL AREAS IN COLORADO, IT IS FEASIBLE TO BUILD
A SINGLE FAMILY STARTER HOME THAT CAN BE SOLD FOR LESS THAN FIVE
HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS ON A LOT THAT IS TWO THOUSAND SQUARE
FEET OR SMALLER;
(d) THE SMALLER THE LOT SIZE, THE MORE AFFORDABLE SINGLE
FAMILY STARTER HOMES CAN BE. IN ORDER FOR DEVELOPERS TO BUILD
STARTER HOMES THAT COLORADANS CAN AFFORD, THEY MUST BE ABLE TO
BUILD ON SMALLER LOTS. IN MANY JURISDICTIONS, DEVELOPERS ARE NOT
ABLE TO BUILD ON SMALLER LOTS DUE TO UNNECESSARILY LARGE
-2- 1114

MINIMUM LOT SIZE REQUIREMENTS; AND
(e) THERE IS COLORADO-SPECIFIC GUIDANCE FOR SUBJECT
JURISDICTIONS TO FOLLOW IN IMPLEMENTING THE NEW MINIMUM LOT SIZE
ALLOWANCE. THE COLORADO STARTER HOME INITIATIVE IS PUBLISHING
A STARTER HOME ZONING TEMPLATE, WHICH IS A FLEXIBLE ROADMAP THAT
WILL HELP COMMUNITIES CREATE CONDITIONS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF
MORE AFFORDABLE HOUSING, AND INCLUDES GUIDANCE RELATED TO LOT
SIZES.
(2) THEREFORE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS, DETERMINES, AND
DECLARES THAT:
(a) ALLOWING A CONSISTENT MINIMUM LOT SIZE FOR SINGLE
FAMILY RESIDENTIAL LOTS WILL HELP TO INCREASE HOUSING
AFFORDABILITY, THEREBY HELPING ALL COLORADANS;
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DOES NOT INTEND TO CREATE ANY
ADDITIONAL BURDEN ON SUBJECT JURISDICTIONS IN ALLOWING MINIMUM
LOT SIZE REQUIREMENTS, AND THEREFORE HAS PROVIDED THAT
IMPLEMENTATION MAY HAPPEN AT ANY POINT BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2031,
WHICH ALLOWS SUBJECT JURISDICTIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE REQUIREMENT
AS A PART OF AN EXISTING PROCESS; AND
(c) ALLOWING A CONSISTENT MINIMUM LOT SIZE FOR SINGLE
FAMILY RESIDENTIAL LOTS IS A MATTER OF MIXED STATE AND LOCAL
CONCERN. THE AFFORDABILITY OF HOUSING IN ONE COMMUNITY AFFECTS
NEIGHBORING COMMUNITIES, AND COLORADO'S HOUSING SUPPLY IMPACTS
TRANSIT, TRANSPORTATION, EMPLOYMENT, ECONOMY, ENERGY, WATER,
AND INFRASTRUCTURE AND REQUIRES COLLABORATIVE SOLUTIONS.
29-35-502. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 5, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
-3- 1114

REQUIRES:
(1) "EXEMPT LOT" MEANS A LOT THAT IS:
(a) NOT SERVED BY A DOMESTIC WATER AND SEWAGE TREATMENT
SYSTEM, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-65.1-104 (5);
(b) SERVED BY A WELL THAT IS NOT CONNECTED TO A WATER
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 25-9-102 (6);
(c) SERVED BY A SEPTIC TANK, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 25-10-103
(18);
(d) LOCATED WITHIN A COMMON INTEREST COMMUNITY, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 38-33.3-103 (8), THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN A SUBJECT
JURISDICTION AND WAS CREATED BEFORE THE SUBJECT JURISDICTION
CAME INTO COMPLIANCE WITH THIS PART 5; OR
(e) A HISTORIC PROPERTY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 29-35-402 (11),
THAT IS LOCATED OUTSIDE OF A HISTORIC DISTRICT, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 29-35-402 (10).
(2) "SUBJECT JURISDICTION" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 29-35-402 (21).
29-35-503. Permitted minimum lot size for subject
jurisdictions.
(1) ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2031, A SUBJECT JURISDICTION
SHALL NOT REQUIRE:
(a) THAT A LOT HAVE AN AREA LARGER THAN TWO THOUSAND
SQUARE FEET IF THE LOT'S RESIDENTIAL USE IS LIMITED TO A SINGLE
FAMILY HOME; OR
(b) MINIMUM LOT FRONTAGE, SETBACKS, OPEN SPACE, OR
MAXIMUM LOT COVERAGE DIMENSIONS THAT HAVE THE PRACTICAL EFFECT
OF PREVENTING THE CONSTRUCTION OF A SINGLE FAMILY HOME ON A LOT
-4- 1114

THAT HAS AN AREA OF TWO THOUSAND SQUARE FEET AND THAT HAS A
RESIDENTIAL USE LIMITED TO A SINGLE FAMILY HOME.
(2) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A LOT WITH A RESIDENTIAL USE THAT
IS LIMITED TO A SINGLE FAMILY HOME REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE
RESIDENTIAL USE ALLOWS ACCESSORY DWELLING UNITS OR GROUP HOMES,
BUT DOES NOT APPLY TO AN EXEMPT LOT.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PREVENTS A SUBJECT JURISDICTION
FROM:
(a) APPLYING AND ENFORCING A LOCAL INFRASTRUCTURE
STANDARD, INCLUDING A STANDARD RELATED TO UTILITIES,
TRANSPORTATION, OR PUBLIC WORKS CODE;
(b) APPLYING AND ENFORCING A LOCAL LIFE SAFETY CODE,
INCLUDING A BUILDING, FIRE, UTILITY, OR STORMWATER CODE;
(c) APPLYING AND ENFORCING A REGULATION RELATED TO HUMAN
AND ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH AND SAFETY, INCLUDING OIL AND GAS
SETBACKS, FLOODPLAIN REGULATIONS, AND AIRPORT INFLUENCE AREAS;
(d) ADOPTING GENERALLY APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS FOR THE
PAYMENT OF IMPACT FEES OR OTHER SIMILAR DEVELOPMENT CHARGES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 29-20-104.5, OR THE MITIGATION OF IMPACTS
IN ACCORDANCE WITH PART 2 OF ARTICLE 20 OF THIS TITLE 29;
(e) REQUIRING A STATEMENT BY A WATER OR WASTEWATER
SERVICE PROVIDER REGARDING THE PROVIDER'S CAPACITY TO SERVICE A
LOT; OR
(f) APPLYING THE DESIGN STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES OF A
HISTORIC DISTRICT TO A LOT LOCATED WITHIN A HISTORIC DISTRICT.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
-5- 1114

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-6- 1114